incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="kos/ť__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ť</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ť</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ťou</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tí</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiam</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiach</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ťami</l>
          <r>ť<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chlap/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stroj/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ochotsk/é more__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ého<b/>mora</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ému<b/>moru</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é<b/>more</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om<b/>mori</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ým<b/>morom</l>
          <r>é<b/>more<s n="np"/><s n="hyd"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="chlap"><i>chlap</i><par n="chlap/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stroj"><i>stroj</i><par n="stroj/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akčnosť"><i>akčnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="analytickosť"><i>analytickos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asynchrónnosť"><i>asynchrónnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belavosť"><i>belavos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezcharakternosť"><i>bezcharakternos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezostyšnosť"><i>bezostyšnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezstratovosť"><i>bezstratovos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezvýraznosť"><i>bezvýraznos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blahoprajnosť"><i>blahoprajnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bojaschopnosť"><i>bojaschopnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brutálnosť"><i>brutálnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralizovanosť"><i>centralizovanos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ctihodnosť"><i>ctihodnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čerstvosť"><i>čerstvos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čnosť"><i>čnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="defenzívnosť"><i>defenzívnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dengľavosť"><i>dengľavos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diferencovanosť"><i>diferencovanos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobráckosť"><i>dobráckos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dojímavosť"><i>dojímavos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dospelosť"><i>dospelos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dravosť"><i>dravos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dudravosť"><i>dudravos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvojjedinnosť"><i>dvojjedinnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="efektnosť"><i>efektnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epochálnosť"><i>epochálnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="expresívnosť"><i>expresívnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="farbosleposť"><i>farboslepos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frapantnosť"><i>frapantnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="globálnosť"><i>globálnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanebnosť"><i>hanebnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlučnosť"><i>hlučnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homogénnosť"><i>homogénnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hrčovitosť"><i>hrčovitos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hrsť"><i>hrs</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hundravosť"><i>hundravos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chlipnosť"><i>chlipnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="identifikovateľnosť"><i>identifikovateľnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jalovosť"><i>jalovos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontradiktórnosť"><i>kontradiktórnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ľahkovážnosť"><i>ľahkovážnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menlivosť"><i>menlivos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mravnosť"><i>mravnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="návesť"><i>náves</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nevyhnutnosť"><i>nevyhnutnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odolnosť"><i>odolnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="osobitosť"><i>osobitos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="platnosť"><i>platnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podvyživenosť"><i>podvyživenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poľutovaniahodnosť"><i>poľutovaniahodnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porovnateľnosť"><i>porovnateľnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="použiteľnosť"><i>použiteľnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pozvožnosť"><i>pozvožnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="predráždenosť"><i>predráždenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prevoditeľnosť"><i>prevoditeľnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="príkladnosť"><i>príkladnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="progresívnosť"><i>progresívnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rafinovanosť"><i>rafinovanos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romantickosť"><i>romantickos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozložiteľnosť"><i>rozložiteľnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roztopašnosť"><i>roztopašnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samodruhosť"><i>samodruhos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="schodnosť"><i>schodnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slabikotvornosť"><i>slabikotvornos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidárnosť"><i>solidárnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoluzodpovednosť"><i>spoluzodpovednos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="starostlivosť"><i>starostlivos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stručnosť"><i>stručnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sústredenosť"><i>sústredenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sychravosť"><i>sychravos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="školopovinnosť"><i>školopovinnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šťúplosť"><i>šťúplos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teplokrvnosť"><i>teplokrvnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trojitosť"><i>trojitos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="účasť"><i>účas</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="únikovosť"><i>únikovos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úslužnosť"><i>úslužnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uvedomenosť"><i>uvedomenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vehementnosť"><i>vehementnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vlažnosť"><i>vlažnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vulgárnosť"><i>vulgárnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vypočítavosť"><i>vypočítavos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vývojaschopnosť"><i>vývojaschopnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zádumčivosť"><i>zádumčivos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zamyslenosť"><i>zamyslenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zatrpknutosť"><i>zatrpknutos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zhodnosť"><i>zhodnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zmierlivosť"><i>zmierlivos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zrohovatenosť"><i>zrohovatenos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zvrchovanosť"><i>zvrchovanos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žoviálnosť"><i>žoviálnos</i><par n="kos/ť__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ochotské more"><i>Ochotsk</i><par n="Ochotsk/é more__np"/></e>
